Louisiana, session 2026, HB108.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:3041(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3041. Qualifications of juror in civil cases
* * *
B. The qualifications of a juror in any civil case are as required by Article
401 of the Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure, except that the prohibition against
persons convicted of a crime of violence or a sex offense shall not apply to civil
jurors.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 401(A)(6) is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
Art. 401. General qualifications of jurors
A. In order to qualify to serve as a juror, a person shall meet all of the
following requirements:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 108 ENROLLED
(6) Not have been convicted at any time of a felony crime of violence as
defined in R.S. 14:2(B) or a felony sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541(24).
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.